California statutes. Insurance Code
(e) “Called assessment” means an assessment as to which a notice has been issued by the association to member insurers requiring that an authorized assessment be paid within a timeframe set forth in the notice. “Called,” when used in the context of assessments, means required by notice to be paid by member insurers. An authorized assessment becomes a called assessment when notice is mailed by the association to member insurers.

(f) “Commissioner” means the Insurance Commissioner.

(g) “Contractual obligation” means any obligation under a policy or contract, or certificate under a group policy or contract, or portion thereof, for
 which coverage is provided under Section 1067.02.

(h) “Covered policy” means a policy or contract or portion of a policy or contract for which coverage is provided under Section 1067.02.

(i) “Extracontractual claims” shall include, for example, claims relating to bad faith in the payment of claims, punitive or exemplary damages, or attorney’s fees and costs.

(j) “Impaired insurer” means a member insurer which, after the effective date of this article, is not an insolvent insurer, and is placed under an order of rehabilitation or conservation by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(k) “Insolvent insurer” means a member insurer that, after October 1, 1990, is placed under an order of liquidation by a court of competent jurisdiction with a finding of
 insolvency.

(l) “Member insurer” means any insurer licensed or which holds a certificate of authority to transact in this state any kind of insurance for which coverage is provided under Section 1067.02 and includes any insurer whose license or certificate of authority in this state may have been suspended, revoked, not renewed, or voluntarily withdrawn, but does not include any of the following:

(1) A hospital or medical service organization, whether for profit or nonprofit.

(2) A health maintenance organization.

(3) A fraternal benefit society.

(4) A mandatory state pooling plan.

(5) A mutual assessment company or other
 person that operates on an assessment basis.

(6) An insurance exchange.

(7) An organization that has a certificate or license limited to the issuance of charitable gift annuities.

(8) A grants and annuities society holding a certificate of authority under Section 11520.

(9) An entity similar to any of the above.

(m) “Moody’s Corporate Bond Yield Average” means the Monthly Average Corporates as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc., or any successor thereto.

(n) “Owner” of a policy or contract and “policy owner” and “contract owner” mean the person who is identified as the legal owner under the terms of the policy or
 contract or who is otherwise vested with legal title to the policy or contract through a valid assignment completed in accordance with the terms of the policy or contract and properly recorded as the owner on the books of the insurer. The terms owner, contract owner, and policy owner do not include persons with a mere beneficial interest in a policy or contract.

(o) “Person” means an individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association, governmental body or entity, or voluntary organization.

(p) “Plan sponsor” means any of the following:

(1) The employer in the case of a benefit plan established or maintained by a single employer.

(2) The employee organization in the case of a benefit plan established or maintained by an employee
 organization.

(3) In a case of a benefit plan established or maintained by two or more employers or jointly by one or more employers and one or more employee organizations, the association, committee, joint board of trustees, or other similar group of representatives of the parties who establish or maintain the benefit plan.

(q) (1) “Premiums” means amounts or considerations, by whatever name called, received on covered policies or contracts less returned premiums, considerations, and deposits and less dividends and experience credits.

(2) “Premiums” does not include amounts or considerations received for policies or contracts or for the portions of policies or contracts for which coverage is not provided under subdivision (b) of Section 1067.02, except that assessable premium shall not be
 reduced on account of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1067.02 relating to interest limitations and paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 1067.02 relating to limitations with respect to one individual, one participant, and one contract owner.

(3) “Premiums” does not include any of the following:

(A) Premiums on an unallocated annuity contract.

(B) With respect to multiple nongroup policies of life insurance owned by one owner, whether the policy owner is an individual, firm, corporation, or other person, and whether the persons insured are officers, managers, employees, or other persons, premiums in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000) with respect to these policies or contracts, regardless of the number of policies or contracts held by the owner.

(r) (1) “Principal place of business” of a plan sponsor or a person other than a natural person means the single state in which the natural persons who establish policy for the direction, control, and coordination of the operations of the entity as a whole primarily exercise that function, determined by the association in its reasonable judgment by considering all the following factors:

(A) The state in which the primary executive and administrative headquarters of the entity are located.

(B) The state in which the principal office of the chief executive officer of the entity is located.

(C) The state in which the board of directors, or similar governing persons, of the entity conducts the majority of its meetings.

(D) The state in which the executive or management committee of the board of directors, or similar governing persons, of the entity conducts the majority of its meetings.

(E) The state from which the management of the overall operations of the entity is directed.

(F) In the case of a benefit plan sponsored by affiliated companies comprising a consolidated corporation, the state in which the holding company or controlling affiliate has its principal place of business as determined using the above factors. However, in the case of a plan sponsor, if more than 50 percent of the participants in the benefit plan are employed in a single state, that state shall be deemed to be the principal place of business of the plan sponsor.

(2) The principal place of
 business of a plan sponsor of a benefit plan shall be deemed to be the principal place of business of the association, committee, joint board of trustees, or other similar group of representatives of the parties who establish or maintain the benefit plan that, in lieu of a specific or clear designation of a principal place of business, shall be deemed to be the principal place of business of the employer or employee organization that has the largest investment in the benefit plan in question.

(s) “Receivership court” means the court in the insolvent or impaired insurer’s state having jurisdiction over the conservation, rehabilitation, or liquidation of the insurer.

(t) “Resident” means a person to whom a contractual obligation is owed and who resides in this state on the date of entry of a court order that determines a member insurer to be an impaired insurer or a court order that
 determines a member insurer to be an insolvent insurer. A person may be a resident of only one state, which in the case of a person other than a natural person shall be its principal place of business. Citizens of the United States who are either residents of foreign countries, or residents of United States’ possessions, territories, or protectorates that do not have an association similar to the association created by this article shall be deemed residents of the state of domicile of the insurer that issued the policies or contracts.

(u) “State” means a state, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, and a United States possession, territory, or protectorate.

(v) “Structured settlement annuity” means an annuity purchased in order to fund periodic payments for a plaintiff or other claimant in payment for, or with respect to, personal injury suffered by the plaintiff or other
 claimant.

(w) “Supplemental contract” means a written agreement entered into for the distribution of proceeds under a life, health, or annuity policy or a life, health, or annuity contract.

(x) “Unallocated annuity contract” means an annuity contract or group annuity certificate which is not issued to and owned by an individual, except to the extent of any annuity benefits guaranteed to an individual by an insurer under the contract or certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 334, Sec. 4.   (SB 1408)   Effective September 27, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1067.05.

(a) A nonprofit legal entity to be known as the California Life and Health Insurance Guarantee Association shall exist as a result of the merger of the Seastrand Health Insurance Guaranty Association with and into the California Life Insurance Guaranty Association pursuant to Section 1067.055. All member insurers shall be and remain members of the association as a condition of their authority to transact insurance in this state. The association shall perform its functions under the plan of operation established and approved under Section 1067.09 and shall exercise its powers through a board of directors established under Section 1067.06. For purposes of administration and assessment, the association shall maintain the following two accounts:

(1) The life insurance and annuity account which includes both of the following subaccounts:

(A) The life insurance account.

(B) The annuity account, which shall include annuity contracts owned by a governmental retirement plan, or its trustee, established under Section 401, 403(b), or 457 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) The health insurance account.

(b) The association shall come under the immediate supervision of the commissioner and shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the insurance laws of this state. Meetings or records of the association may be opened to the public upon majority vote of the board of directors of the association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 334, Sec. 5.   (SB 1408)   Effective September 27, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1067.055.

In order to provide for the merger of the Seastrand Health Insurance Guaranty Association with and into the California Life Insurance Guaranty Association, the following shall apply:

(a) Notwithstanding the repeal of the California Life Insurance Guaranty Association Act and the Seastrand Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act, the Seastrand Health Insurance Guaranty Association shall, effective immediately prior to that repeal, be merged with and into the California Life Insurance Guaranty Association, which shall then be known as the California Life and Health Insurance Guarantee Association.

(b) Notwithstanding the repeal of the
 California Life Insurance Guaranty Association Act and the Seastrand Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act, but subject to the last sentence of this subdivision, all of the following shall apply:

(1) The association shall succeed, without other transfer, to all the rights, powers, privileges, assets, and property of each of the California Life Insurance Guaranty Association and the Seastrand Health Insurance Guaranty Association, which for the purposes of this section shall be referred collectively as the merging associations. The association shall be subject to all debts, obligations, and liabilities of each merging association in the same manner as if the association had itself incurred them, in each case under the law in effect prior to the effective date of this article, as those rights, powers, privileges, obligations, debts, and liabilities may be amended and restated in this article, and in each case with respect to member insurers
 that became impaired insurers or insolvent insurers prior to the effective date of this article and after October 1, 1990. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the association shall succeed to (A) all collected, uncollected, or unbilled assessments of the merging associations, (B) all cash, bank accounts, and accrued interest of the merging associations, (C) all rights, powers, privileges, and obligations of the merging associations under any contracts or commitments of the merging association, (D) all subrogations, assignments, and creditor rights and interests of the merging associations, and (E) all rights, powers, privileges, and obligations of each of the trusts established on December 31, 1993, by each of the merging associations as settlor.

(2) All rights of creditors and all liens upon the property of each of the merging associations shall be preserved unimpaired, provided that the liens upon property of a merging
 association shall be limited to the property affected thereby immediately prior to the effective date of this article.

(3) Any action or proceeding pending by or against a merging association may be prosecuted to judgment, which shall bind the association, or the association may be proceeded against or be substituted in its place.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this subdivision, all debts, obligations, and liabilities of a merging association that were to be paid out of a specified account of the merging association shall be paid solely out of the assets of that merging association that were available to that merging association to pay those debts and liabilities, including, without limitation, collected, uncollected, or unbilled assessments, and any and all subrogation, assignment, and creditor rights, or out of assets in the same type of account of the association.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary in this article:

(1) It is the intent of this section to preserve rights, powers, privileges, assets, property, debts, obligations, and liabilities of each of the merging associations, and not to provide contract owners and policy owners, or their respective payees, beneficiaries, or assignees, with duplicative rights, powers, privileges, assets, or property.

(2) Accordingly, no contract owner and policy owner, and no contract owner’s or policy owner’s payee, beneficiary, or assignee, shall be entitled to (A) a recovery from the association that is duplicative of a previous recovery from either of the merging associations, or the trust established by either merging association, or (B) a recovery from the association on account of a claim against either of the
 merging associations where the association is liable with respect to a claim under the same policy or contract under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 334, Sec. 6.   (SB 1408)   Effective September 27, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1067.06.

(a) The board of directors of the association shall consist of not less than 9 nor more than 13 member insurers serving terms as established in the plan of operation. The insurer members of the board shall be selected by member insurers subject to the approval of the commissioner. The board shall also include two additional members who represent the public generally. The public representatives shall be appointed by the commissioner. A public representative may not be an officer, director, or employee of an insurance company or a health
 maintenance organization, or any person engaged in the business of insurance. Vacancies on the board shall be filled for the remaining period of the term by a majority vote of the remaining board members, subject to the approval of the commissioner. To select the initial board of directors, and initially organize the association, the commissioner shall give notice to all member insurers of the time and place of the organizational meeting. In determining voting rights at the organizational meeting each member insurer shall be entitled to one vote in person or by proxy. If the board of directors is not selected within 60 days after notice of the organizational meeting, the commissioner may appoint the initial members.

(b) In approving selections or in appointing members to the board, the commissioner shall consider, among other things, whether
 all member insurers are fairly represented.

(c) Members of the board may be reimbursed from the assets of the association for expenses incurred by them as members of the board of directors, but members of the board shall not otherwise be compensated by the association for their services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 236, Sec. 1.   (AB 1104)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1067.07.

(a) If a member insurer is an impaired insurer, the association may, in its discretion, and subject to the conditions imposed by the association that do not impair the contractual obligations of the impaired insurer and that are approved by the commissioner, do any of the following:

(1) Guarantee, assume, or reinsure, or cause to be guaranteed, assumed, or reinsured, any or all of the policies or contracts of the impaired insurer.

(2) Provide moneys, pledges, loans, notes, guarantees, or other means to effectuate paragraph (1) and assure payment of the contractual obligations of the impaired insurer pending action under paragraph (1).

(b) If a member insurer is an insolvent insurer, the association shall, in its discretion, either do those things described in paragraph (1) or in paragraph (2):

(1) (A) Guarantee, assume, or reinsure, or cause to be guaranteed, assumed, or reinsured, the policies or contracts of the insolvent insurer; or

(B) Assure payment of the contractual obligations of the insolvent insurer; and

(C) Provide moneys, pledges, loans, notes, guarantees, or other means reasonably necessary to discharge the association’s duties.

(2) Provide benefits and coverages in accordance with the following provisions:

(A) With respect to life and health insurance policies and
 annuities, assure payment of benefits for premiums identical to the premiums and benefits, except for terms of conversion and renewability, that would have been payable under the policies or contracts of the insolvent insurer, for claims incurred:

(i) With respect to group policies and contracts, not later than the earlier of the next renewal date under those policies or contracts or 45 days, but in no event less than 30 days, after the date on which the association becomes obligated with respect to the policies and contracts.

(ii) With respect to nongroup policies, contracts, and annuities, not later than the earlier of the next renewal date, if any, under the policies or contracts or one year, but in no event less than 30 days, from the date on which the association becomes obligated with respect to the policies or contracts.

(B) Make diligent efforts to provide all known insureds or annuitants, for nongroup policies and contracts, or group policy owners with respect to group policies and contracts, 30 days’ notice of the termination, pursuant to subparagraph (A), of the benefits provided.

(C) With respect to nongroup life and health insurance policies and annuities covered by the association, make available to each known insured or annuitant, or owner if other than the insured or annuitant, and with respect to an individual formerly insured or formerly an annuitant under a group policy who is not eligible for replacement group coverage, make available substitute coverage on an individual basis in accordance with subparagraph (D), if the insureds or annuitants had a right under law or the terminated policy or annuity to convert coverage to individual coverage or to continue an individual policy or annuity in force until a specified age or for a
 specified time, during which the insurer had no right unilaterally to make changes in a provision of the policy or annuity or had a right only to make changes in premium by class.

(D) (i) In providing the substitute coverage required under subparagraph (C), the association may offer either to reissue the terminated coverage or to issue an alternative policy and shall consider obtaining coverage for a medically uninsurable person.

(ii) Alternative or reissued policies shall be offered without requiring evidence of insurability, and shall not provide for a waiting period or exclusion that would not have applied under the terminated policy.

(iii) The association may reinsure an alternative or reissued policy.

(E) (i) Alternative policies adopted by the association shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner. The association may adopt alternative policies of various types for future issuance without regard to any particular impairment or insolvency.

(ii) Alternative policies shall contain at least the minimum statutory provisions required in this state and provide benefits that shall not be unreasonable in relation to the premium charged. The association shall set the premium in accordance with a table of rates that it shall adopt. The premium shall reflect the amount of insurance to be provided and the age and class of risk of each insured, but shall not reflect the changes in the health of the insured after the original policy was last underwritten.

(iii) An alternative policy issued by the association shall provide coverage of a type similar to that of the policy
 issued by the impaired or insolvent insurer, as determined by the association.

(F) If the association elects to reissue terminated coverage at a premium rate different from that charged under the terminated policy, the premium shall be set by the association in accordance with the amount of insurance provided and the age and class of risk, subject to approval of the commissioner or by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(G) The association’s obligations with respect to coverage under a policy of the impaired or insolvent insurer or under a reissued or alternative policy shall cease on the date the coverage or policy is replaced by another similar policy by the policy owner, the insured, or the association.

(H) When proceeding under this paragraph with respect to a policy or contract carrying guaranteed minimum
 interest rates, the association shall assure the payment or crediting of a rate of interest consistent with subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1067.02.

(c) Nonpayment of premiums within 31 days after the date required under the terms of a guaranteed, assumed, alternative, or reissued policy or contract or substitute coverage shall terminate the association’s obligations under the policy or coverage under this article with respect to that policy or coverage, except with respect to the claims incurred or a net cash surrender value that may be due in accordance with this article.

(d) Premiums due for coverage after entry of an order of liquidation of an insolvent insurer shall belong to and be payable at the direction of the association, and the association shall be liable for unearned premiums due to policy or contract owners arising after the entry of
 that order.

(e) The protection provided by this article shall not apply if a guarantee protection is provided to residents of this state by the laws of the domiciliary state or jurisdiction of the impaired or insolvent insurer other than this state.

(f) In carrying out its duties under subdivision (b), the association may, subject to approval by a court of competent jurisdiction, do either of the following:

(1) Impose permanent policy or contract liens in connection with a guarantee, assumption, or reinsurance agreement, if the association finds that the amounts that can be assessed under this article are less than the amounts needed to assure full and prompt performance of the association’s duties under this article, or that the economic or financial conditions as they affect member insurers are sufficiently adverse
 to render the imposition of the permanent policy or contract liens, to be in the public interest.

(2) Impose temporary moratoriums or liens on payments of cash values and policy loans, or any other right to withdraw funds held in conjunction with policies or contracts, in addition to the contractual provisions for deferral of cash or policy loan value. In addition, in the event of a temporary moratorium or moratorium charge imposed by the receivership court on payment of cash values or policy loans, or on any other right to withdraw funds held in conjunction with policies or contracts, out of the assets of the impaired or insolvent insurer, the association may defer the payment of cash values, policy loans, or other rights by the association for the period of the moratorium or moratorium charge imposed by the receivership court, except for claims covered by the association to be paid in accordance with a hardship procedure established by the
 liquidator or rehabilitator and approved by the receivership court.

(g) A deposit in this state, held pursuant to law or required by the commissioner for the benefit of creditors, including policy owners, not turned over to the domiciliary liquidator upon the entry of a final order of liquidation or order approving a rehabilitation plan of an insurer domiciled in this state or in a reciprocal state shall be promptly paid to the association. The association shall be entitled to retain a portion of an amount so paid to it equal to the percentage determined by dividing the aggregate amount of policy owners’ claims related to that insolvency for which the association has provided statutory benefits by the aggregate amount of all policy owners’ claims in this state related to that insolvency and shall remit to the domiciliary receiver the amount so paid to the association less the amount retained pursuant to this subdivision. An amount so paid to
 the association and retained by it shall be treated as a distribution of estate assets pursuant to applicable state receivership law dealing with early access disbursements.

(h) If the association fails to act within a reasonable period of time with respect to an insolvent insurer, as provided in subdivision (b), the commissioner shall have the powers and duties of the association under this article with respect to the insolvent insurer.

(i) The association may render assistance and advice to the commissioner, upon his or her request, concerning rehabilitation, payment of claims, continuance of coverage, or the performance of other contractual obligations of an impaired or insolvent insurer.

(j) The association shall have standing to appear or intervene before a court or agency engaged in an adjudication in this
 state with jurisdiction over an impaired or insolvent insurer concerning which the association is or may become obligated under this article or with jurisdiction over a person or property against which the association may have rights through subrogation or otherwise. Standing shall extend to all matters germane to the powers and duties of the association, including, but not limited to, proposals for reinsuring, modifying, or guaranteeing the policies or contracts of the impaired or insolvent insurer and the determination of the policies or contracts and contractual obligations. The association shall also have the right to appear or intervene before a court or agency in another state with jurisdiction over an impaired or insolvent insurer for which the association is or may become obligated or with jurisdiction over a person or property against which the association may have rights through subrogation or otherwise.

(k) (1) A person receiving benefits under this article shall be deemed to have assigned the rights under, and causes of action against a person for losses arising under, resulting from, or otherwise relating to, the covered policy or contract to the association to the extent of the benefits received because of this article, whether the benefits are payments of or on account of contractual obligations, continuation of coverage, or provision of substitute or alternative coverages. The association may require an assignment to it of those rights and cause of action by a payee, policy or contract owner, beneficiary, insured, or annuitant as a condition precedent to the receipt of any right or benefits conferred by this article upon that person.

(2) The subrogation rights of the association under this subdivision shall have the same priority against the assets of the impaired or insolvent insurer as that possessed by the person entitled to
 receive benefits under this article.

(3) In addition to paragraphs (1) and (2), the association shall have all common law rights of subrogation and any other equitable or legal remedy that would have been available to the impaired or insolvent insurer or owner, beneficiary, or payee of a policy or contract with respect to the policy or contracts, including, without limitation, in the case of a structured settlement annuity, the rights of the owner, beneficiary, or payee of the annuity, to the extent of benefits received pursuant to this article, against a person originally or by succession responsible for the losses arising from the personal injury relating to the annuity or payment therefor, excepting a person responsible solely by reason of serving as an assignee in respect of a qualified assignment under Section 130 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(4) If the preceding provisions
 of this subdivision are invalid or ineffective with respect to a person or claim, the amount payable by the association with respect to the related covered obligations shall be reduced by the amount realized by any other person with respect to the person or claim that is attributable to the policies, or portion thereof, covered by the association.

(5) If the association has provided benefits with respect to a covered obligation and a person recovers amounts as to which the association has rights as described in the preceding paragraphs of this subdivision, the person shall pay to the association the portion of the recovery attributable to the policies, or portion thereof, covered by the association.

(l) In addition to the rights and powers elsewhere in this article, the association may do any of the following:

(1) Enter into contracts necessary or proper to carry out the provisions and purposes of this article.

(2) Sue or be sued, including taking the legal actions necessary or proper to recover unpaid assessments under Section 1067.08 and to settle claims or potential claims against it.

(3) Borrow money to effect the purposes of this article. Notes or other evidence of indebtedness of the association not in default shall be legal investments for domestic insurers and may be carried as admitted assets.

(4) Employ or retain an executive director and other persons to handle the financial transactions of the association, and to perform other functions necessary or proper under this article, provided that the executive director shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner.

(5) Take legal action necessary or appropriate to avoid or recover payment of improper claims.

(6) Exercise, for the purposes of this article and to the extent approved by the commissioner, the powers of a domestic life or health insurer, but in no case may the association issue insurance policies or annuity contracts other than those issued to perform its obligations under this article.

(7) Organize itself as a corporation or in another legal form permitted by the laws of the state.

(8) Request information from a person seeking coverage from the association in order to aid the association in determining its obligations under this article with respect to the person, and the person shall promptly comply with the request.

(9) File for an actuarially justified rate or premium increase for a policy or contract, in accordance with the terms and conditions of the policy or contract, for which the association provides coverage pursuant to this act, unless prohibited by law.

(10) Take other necessary or appropriate action to discharge its duties and obligations under this article or to exercise its powers under this article.

(m) The association may join an organization of one or more other state associations of similar purposes, to further the purposes and administer the powers and duties of the association.

(n) There shall be no liability on the part of and no cause of action shall arise against the association or against a transferee from the association in connection with the
 transfer by reinsurance or otherwise of all or any part of an impaired or insolvent insurer’s business by reason of an action taken or a failure to take an action by the impaired or insolvent insurer at any time.

(o) With respect to covered policies for which the association becomes obligated after an entry of an order or liquidation or rehabilitation, the association may elect to succeed to the rights of the insolvent insurer arising after the date of the order of liquidation or rehabilitation under a contract of reinsurance to which the insolvent insurer was a party, to the extent that the contract provides coverage for losses occurring after the date of the order of liquidation or rehabilitation. As a condition to making this election, the association must pay all unpaid premiums due under the contract for coverage relating to periods before and after the date of the order of liquidation or rehabilitation.

(p) The board of directors of the association shall have discretion and may exercise reasonable business judgment to determine the means by which the association is to provide the benefits of this article in an economical and efficient manner.

(q) If the association has arranged or offered to provide the benefits of this article to a covered person under a plan or arrangement that fulfills the association’s obligations under this article, the person shall not be entitled to benefits from the association in addition to or other than those provided under the plan or arrangement.

(r) The association shall not be required to give an appeal bond in an appeal that relates to a cause of action arising under this article.

(s) In carrying out its duties in
 connection with guaranteeing, assuming, or reinsuring policies or contracts under subdivision (a) or (b), the association may, subject to approval of the receivership court, issue substitute coverage for a policy or contract that provides an interest rate, crediting rate, or similar factor determined by use of an index or other external reference stated in the policy or contract employed in calculating returns or changes in value by issuing an alternative policy or contract in accordance with all of the following provisions:

(1) In lieu of the index or other external reference provided for in the original policy or contract, the alternative policy or contract provides for a fixed interest rate, payment of dividends with minimum guarantees, or a different method for calculating interest or changes in value.

(2) There is no requirement for evidence of insurability, waiting period,
 or other exclusion that would not have applied under the replaced policy or contract.

(3) The alternative policy or contract is substantially similar to the replaced policy or contract in all other material terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 651, Sec. 1.   (AB 2395)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1067.08.

(a) For the purpose of providing the funds necessary to carry out the powers and duties of the association, the board of directors shall assess the member insurers, separately for each account, at the time and for the amounts as the board finds necessary. Assessments shall be due not more than 30 days after prior written notice to the member insurers and shall accrue interest at the rate of 10 percent per annum on and after the due date.

(b) There shall be two classes of assessments, as follows:

(1) Class A assessments shall be authorized and called for the purpose of meeting administrative and legal costs and other
 expenses and examinations conducted under the authority of subdivision (e) of Section 1067.11. Class A assessments may be authorized and called whether or not related to a particular impaired or insolvent insurer.

(2) Class B assessments shall be authorized and called to the extent necessary to carry out the powers and duties of the association under Section 1067.07 with regard to an impaired or an insolvent insurer.

(c) (1) The amount of any class A assessment shall be determined at the discretion of the board of directors and such assessments shall be authorized and called on a non pro rata basis. The amount of any class B assessment shall be allocated for assessment purposes among the accounts pursuant to an allocation formula that may be based on the premiums or reserves of the impaired or insolvent insurer or any other standard deemed by the board in its
 sole discretion as being fair and reasonable under the circumstances.

(2) Class B assessments against member insurers for each account shall be in the proportion that the premiums received on business in this state by each assessed member insurer on policies or contracts covered by each account for the three most recent calendar years for which information is available preceding the year in which the insurer became impaired or insolvent, as the case may be, bears to premiums received on business in this state for those calendar years by all assessed member insurers.

(3) Assessments for funds to meet the requirements of the association with respect to an impaired or insolvent insurer shall not be authorized and called until necessary to implement the purposes of this article. Classification of assessments under subdivision (b) and computation of assessments under this subdivision
 shall be made with a reasonable degree of accuracy, recognizing that exact determinations may not always be possible. The association shall notify each member insurer of its anticipated pro rata share of an authorized assessment not yet called within 180 days after the assessment is authorized.

(d) The association may abate or defer, in whole or in part, the assessment of a member insurer if, in the opinion of the board, payment of the assessment would endanger the ability of the member insurer to fulfill its contractual obligations. In the event an assessment against a member insurer is abated, or deferred in whole or in part, the amount by which that assessment is abated or deferred may be assessed against the other member insurers in a manner consistent with the basis for assessments set forth in this section. Once the conditions that caused a deferral have been removed or rectified, the member insurer shall pay all assessments that were
 deferred pursuant to a repayment plan approved by the association.

(e) (1) (A) Subject to the provisions of subparagraph (B), the total of all assessments authorized by the association with respect to a member insurer for each subaccount of the life insurance and annuity account and for the health account shall not in one calendar year exceed 2 percent of that member insurer’s average annual premiums received in this state on the policies and contracts covered by the subaccount or account during the three calendar years preceding the year in which the insurer became an impaired or insolvent insurer.

(B) If two or more assessments are authorized in one calendar year with respect to insurers that become impaired or insolvent in different calendar years, the average annual premiums for purposes of the aggregate assessment percentage